North Carolina, session 2025, HB886.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-12 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(50) Duty to Adopt Rules for Automatic External Defibrillators (AEDs). – The
State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the installation, use, and
maintenance of AEDs in public school units. At a minimum, the rules shall
include provisions for the following:
a. Installation and placement of at least one AED in each school in a
public school unit, placed in the school athletic facility or area.
b. Implementation of an appropriate training course for public school
personnel in the use of AEDs, including the role of cardiopulmonary
resuscitation (CPR) and first aid.
c. Proper maintenance and testing of the AEDs.
d. Coordination with appropriate licensed professionals in the oversight
of training on the AEDs.
e. Coordination with local emergency medical systems regarding the
placement of AEDs in school buildings."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(70) Use of Automatic External Defibrillators (AEDs). – Local boards of education
shall develop policies for the installation, maintenance, and use of AEDs in
accordance with rules developed by the State Board of Education pursuant to
G.S. 115C-12(50)."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-150.12C is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(37) Use of automatic external defibrillators (AEDs). – The board of trustees shall
develop policies for the installation, maintenance, and use of AEDs in
accordance with rules developed by the State Board of Education pursuant to
G.S. 115C-12(50)."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(p) Use of Automatic External Defibrillators (AEDs). – Charter schools shall develop
policies for the installation, maintenance, and use of AEDs in accordance with rules developed
by the State Board of Education pursuant to G.S. 115C-12(50)."
*H886-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) Use of automatic external defibrillators (AEDs). – Regional schools shall
develop policies for the installation, maintenance, and use of AEDs in
accordance with rules developed by the State Board of Education pursuant to
G.S. 115C-12(50)."
SECTION 2.(e) G.S. 116-11 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(15) The Board of Governors shall develop policies for all public secondary
schools under the Board's jurisdiction for the installation, maintenance, and
use of AEDs in accordance with rules developed by the State Board of
Education pursuant to G.S. 115C-12(50)."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of four million one hundred thousand dollars ($4,100,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction on a first-come, first-served basis to governing bodies of public school units in an
amount sufficient to purchase and install one AED per school and train personnel on the proper
use of the AED as required by this act.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 House Bill 886-First Edition